Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.940

Repealer—Savings—1979 ex.s. c 115.

Section 10, chapter 102, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., section 12, chapter 304, Laws of 1977 ex. sess. and RCW 20.01.445 are each repealed.

Such repeals shall not be construed as affecting any existing right acquired under the statutes repealed, nor as affecting any proceeding instituted thereunder, nor any rule, regulation, or order promulgated thereunder, nor any administrative action taken thereunder.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 115 s 6.]